Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 5

Election Procedure Generally

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 888, § 5, provided: “Application.

“(a)(1)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall conduct the initial audit of the results of the general election under this act after the 2020 general election as a pilot program.

“(2)

For each election system utilizing a ballot marking device and tabulator in operation for the 2020 election, the State Board of Election Commissioners shall:

“(A)

Conduct an audit of at least one (1) county with a population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000) people;

“(B)

Conduct an audit of at least four (4) counties with a population of less than one hundred thousand (100,000) people; and

“(C)

Conduct the audits in a manner that effectuates at least one (1) audit from a county in each of the congressional districts of this state.

“(b)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall develop a comprehensive plan to audit the state's election equipment based on the experience gained through this pilot program”.

Cross References.

Political parties, §7-3-101 et seq.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 946 and 963, § 14: Jan. 1, 1996.

Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 5: Oct. 19, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law relating to the designation of polling places in voting precincts in the state is unduly restrictive and that in the best interests of efficiency and convenience of the voting public, it is necessary that authority of the county board of election commissioners to fix polling places be clarified immediately and that this act is designed to do so. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2005, No. 1205, § 2: Mar. 24, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that that the law concerning allocation of election expenses is in need of revision; that this act provides for an appropriate allocation; and that this act is immediately necessary because a delay in its implementation could prevent it from applying to some elections. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

7-5-101. Precinct boundaries, polling sites, and vote centers — Establishment and alteration.

(a)(1)

The county board of election commissioners shall:

(A)

Establish election precincts; and

(B)(i)

Designate a polling site for each precinct.

(ii)

A polling site may serve two (2) or more precincts, including parts of precincts.

(2)

Except as provided in §6-14-106, the designation of polling sites shall be by a unanimous vote of the members of the county board of election commissioners present.

(b)(1)

The county board of election commissioners by order may alter the boundaries of existing election precincts and establish new ones.

(2)

A precinct shall not be altered and a new precinct shall not be created less than sixty (60) days before an election except in the event of an emergency as determined by unanimous vote of the county board of election commissioners.

(3)(A)

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(3)(B) of this section, if more than three thousand (3,000) voters are registered in a precinct, the county board of election commissioners shall redistrict the precinct at least one hundred twenty (120) days before the election.

(B)

If the number of registered voters in the precinct exceeds three thousand (3,000) registered voters during or after the one hundred twenty (120) days before an election, the county board of election commissioners shall redistrict the precinct at least one hundred twenty (120) days before the next election.

(4)(A)

An order to alter the boundaries of any precinct or establish any new one shall not be effective until it has been filed with the county clerk.

(B)

The order shall contain:

(i)

A written description of the boundaries of the precinct;

(ii)

A printed map of the boundaries of the precincts altered or established; and

(iii)

A digital map detailing the precinct boundaries altered or established in a format prescribed by the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office.

(c)(1)

Within thirty (30) days after the boundaries of an election precinct are altered or a new election precinct is established, the county clerk shall submit written, printed, and digital copies of the map and boundaries required under subdivision (b)(4) of this section to the:

(A)

Secretary of State; and

(B)

Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office.

(2)

Upon receipt of the changes, the Secretary of State immediately shall forward a copy to the:

(A)

Office of the Attorney General;

(B)

Census State Data Center;

(C)

Geographic Information Systems and Mapping Section of the Transportation Planning and Policy Division of the Arkansas Department of Transportation; and

(D)

Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office.

(3)

The Secretary of State may:

(A)

Designate each precinct in the state with a unique alphanumeric description that clearly references:

(i)

The precinct designation assigned by the county board of election commissioners; and

(ii)

The county in which the precinct exists;

(B)

Create a map of the State of Arkansas that is divided by precinct; and

(C)

Display the map with the alphanumeric precinct designations on the Secretary of State's internet website.

(d)(1)

Except for school elections under §6-14-106, the polling sites for each election shall be the same as those established for the immediately preceding general election unless changed by order of the county board of election commissioners.

(2)

The county board of election commissioners shall not change a polling site for any precinct less than thirty (30) days before an election, except in the event of an emergency.

(3)(A)

Notice of a change made in a polling site shall be provided by posting information at the polling site used in the last election and by the county clerk mailing notice to affected registered voters at least fifteen (15) days before the election unless:

(i)

The election is a school election;

(ii)

The election is a special election; or

(iii)

The change in polling sites is due to an emergency arising less than fifteen (15) days before the election.

(B)

If the change in polling site occurs in a school election, special election, or due to an emergency arising less than fifteen (15) days before the election, notice of a change made in the polling site shall be provided by posting information at the polling site used in the last election.

(e)(1)(A)

Before establishing one (1) or more vote centers in the county under §7-1-113, the county clerk shall certify to the Secretary of State and the county quorum court that the county has a secure electronic connection sufficient to prevent:

(i)

An elector from voting more than once; and

(ii)

Unauthorized access to a computerized registration book maintained by the county clerk.

(B)

If the county clerk has certified to the county quorum court a determination of sufficiency under subdivision (e)(1)(A) of this section, the county may adopt an ordinance to establish vote centers for elections.

(C)

The ordinance:

(i)

Shall be filed with the county clerk, the county board of election commissioners, and the Secretary of State; and

(ii)

Is effective when it is filed with the county clerk, the county board of election commissioners, and the Secretary of State.

(2)(A)

Except for school elections under §6-14-106, a vote center location for each election shall be the same as that established for the immediately preceding general election unless changed by order of the county clerk or county board of election commissioners.

(B)

The county clerk or county board of election commissioners shall not change a vote center location for any precinct less than thirty (30) days before an election except in the event of an emergency.

(C)

Notice of a change made to a vote center location shall be posted at the vote center location used in the last election, and except for school elections and special elections, the notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least fifteen (15) days before the election.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-601; Acts 1993, No. 717, §§ 1, 3; 1995, No. 876, § 1; 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 1; 1997, No. 451, § 1; 1999, No. 455, § 1; 2003, No. 1165, § 2; 2003, No. 1295, § 2; 2007, No. 694, § 1; 2009, No. 250, § 3; 2009, No. 1480, § 15; 2013, No. 546, § 1; 2013, No. 1126, § 4; 2013, No. 1211, § 2; 2013, No. 1389, § 3; 2015, No. 103, § 8; 2017, No. 707, § 8.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 250 substituted “establish” for “fix” or variant in three places in (a)(2)(A), and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 1480 rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendment by No. 546 rewrote (d)(3).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1126 substituted “Mapping and Graphics Section of the Planning and Research Division” for “Cartography Section” in (c)(2)(C).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1211 rewrote (a), (b) and (c).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1389 added (e).

The 2015 amendment inserted “Systems” in (b)(4)(B)(iii), (c)(1)(B), and (c)(2)(D).

The 2017 amendment, in (c)(2)(C), substituted “Geographic Information Systems and Mapping” for “Mapping and Graphics”, and substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department”.

7-5-102. Time of general election.

On the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in every even-numbered year, there shall be held an election in each precinct and ward in this state for the election of:

(1)

All elective state, county, and township officers whose term of office is fixed at two (2) years by the Arkansas Constitution or the General Assembly;

(2)

State senators in their respective districts when the terms for which the state senators have been elected expire before the next general election;

(3)

Members of the United States House of Representatives for each congressional district in this state; and

(4)

United States Senators when the term of office of any United States Senator expires before the next general election.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-602; Acts 1993, No. 512, § 1; 2005, No. 67, § 5; 2013, No. 1110, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

7-5-103. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning special elections, was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 16. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-603; Acts 2003, No. 1441, § 1; 2005, No. 2145, § 11; 2007, No. 1049, § 13; 2009, No. 26, § 1; 2009, No. 375, § 1.

7-5-104. Election expenses — Allocation.

(a)(1)

All expenses of general elections for presidential, congressional, state, district, county, township, or municipal offices in this state shall be paid by the counties in which they are held.

(2)

However, any city or incorporated town shall reimburse the county board of election commissioners for the expenses of the elections in an amount equal to a figure derived by multiplying fifty percent (50%) of the total cost of each election by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of voters from the city or incorporated town casting ballots in each election prepared by the county board of election commissioners, and the denominator of which shall be the total number of voters casting ballots in each election.

(b)(1)

Except for the expense of party primary elections under §7-7-201 et seq., all expenses for special elections, including runoff elections as required by law, for congressional, state, district, county, and township offices shall be paid by the counties in which they are held.

(2)

All expenses of special elections, including any runoff elections as required by law, for municipal offices shall be paid by the city or incorporated town calling for the elections.

(3)

All expenses of special elections called by any county for the purpose of referring a question or measure to the voters of the county shall be paid by the county.

(4)

All expenses of special elections called by any city or incorporated town for the purpose of referring a question or measure to the voters of the city or incorporated town shall be paid by the city or incorporated town.

History.

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 67, § 2; 2005, No. 1205, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Former §7-5-104, concerning allocation of election expenses, was repealed by Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 67, § 1. The former section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 6, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-609; Acts 1991, No. 921, § 1.

7-5-105. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning payment to county clerk for registered voter lists, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 451, § 17. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1304; Acts 1993, No. 1092, § 2; 1995, No. 924, § 1; 1995, No. 937, § 1. For present law, see §7-5-109.

7-5-106. Runoff elections for county and municipal officers — Definition.

(a)(1)

If there are more than two (2) candidates for election to any county elected office, including the office of justice of the peace, at any general election held in this state and no candidate for the county elected office receives a majority of the votes cast for the county elected office, there shall be a runoff general election held in that county four (4) weeks following the date of the general election at which the names of the two (2) candidates receiving the highest number of votes, but not a majority, shall be placed on the ballot to be voted upon by the qualified electors of the county.

(2)(A)

The following procedure will govern if there are more than two (2) candidates for election to any municipal office at any general election held in this state in which no candidate for the municipal office receives either:

(i)

A majority of the votes cast; or

(ii)

A plurality of forty percent (40%) of the votes cast.

(B)(i)

A candidate who receives a plurality of forty percent (40%) of the votes cast must obtain at least twenty percent (20%) more of the votes cast than the second-place candidate for the municipal office to avoid a runoff general election against the second-place candidate.

(ii)

If required, the runoff general election between the two (2) candidates shall be held in that municipality four (4) weeks following the date of the general election with the names of the two (2) candidates placed on the ballot to be voted upon by the qualified electors of the municipality.

(b)

If two (2) candidates receive the highest number of votes and receive the same number of votes, a tie is deemed to exist and the names of the two (2) candidates shall be placed on the runoff general election ballot to be voted upon by the qualified electors of the county or the municipality, as the case may be.

(c)(1)

If there is one (1) candidate who receives the highest number of votes, but not a majority of the votes, and two (2) other candidates receive the same number of votes for the next highest number of votes cast, a tie is deemed to exist between the two (2) candidates.

(2)

The county board of election commissioners shall determine the runoff candidate by lot at a public meeting and in the presence of the two (2) candidates.

(d)

If one (1) of the two (2) candidates who received the highest number of votes for a county elected office or a municipal office but not a majority of the votes in a county for a county elected office or either a majority or both forty percent (40%) of the votes cast and at least twenty percent (20%) more of the votes cast than the second-place candidate in a municipality for a municipal office in the general election withdraws before certification of the result of the general election, the remaining candidate who received the most votes at the general election shall be declared elected to the county elected office or municipal office and there shall be no runoff general election.

(e)(1)

The person receiving the majority of the votes cast for the county elected office or municipal office at the runoff general election shall be declared elected.

(2)

However, if the two (2) candidates seeking election to the same county elected office or municipal office receive the same number of votes in the runoff general election, a tie is deemed to exist, and the county board of election commissioners shall determine the winner of the runoff general election by lot at an open public meeting and in the presence of the two (2) candidates.

(f)(1)

As used in this section, “municipal office” means offices of cities of the first class and cities of the second class and incorporated towns and includes the offices of council members, members of boards of managers, or other elective municipal offices elected by the voters of the entire municipality or from wards or districts within a municipality.

(2)

“Municipal office” does not include offices of cities having a city manager form of government.

(g)

This section does not apply to election of members of the boards of directors and other officials of cities having a city manager form of government.

(h)

This section is intended to be in addition to and supplemental to the laws of this state pertaining to the election of officers for county elected offices and municipal offices at general elections.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 909, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-616, 3-617; Acts 1991, No. 53, § 1; 1997, No. 451, § 3; 1999, No. 554, § 1; 2003, No. 1165, § 3; 2007, No. 1049, § 14; 2011, No. 1211, §
1; 2017, No. 879, § 1; 2017, No. 1104, § 2; 2019, No. 207, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment inserted present (d), and redesignated the following subdivisions accordingly.

The 2011 amendment, in (a)(1), deleted “or for any municipal office” preceding “at any general election,” substituted “for the county elected office” for “for the municipal or county office,” substituted “votes cast for the county elected office” for “votes cast for the office,” substituted “election held in that county” for “election held in that county or municipality,” and deleted “or the municipality, as the case may be” following “qualified electors of the county”; inserted (a)(2); rewrote (d); inserted “county elected office or municipal” in (e)(1); inserted “elected office” and ”general” in (e)(2); and rewrote (f) through (h).

The 2017 amendment by No. 879 substituted “council members” for “aldermen” in (f)(1).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1104 substituted “four (4) weeks” for “three (3) weeks” in (a)(2)(B)(ii).

The 2019 amendment substituted “four (4) weeks” for “three (3) weeks” in (a)(1).

7-5-107. Use of voter registration lists by poll workers.

(a)(1)

In any election conducted in this state, precinct voter registration lists shall be used by poll workers in each polling place.

(2)(A)

An electronic poll book may be used by poll workers in each polling place.

(B)

The functions of an electronic poll book may include without limitation:

(i)

Voter lookup;

(ii)

Voter verification;

(iii)

Voter identification;

(iv)

Precinct assignment;

(v)

Ballot assignment;

(vi)

Recording when a voter presents himself or herself to an election official and requests a ballot; and

(vii)

Redirecting voters to the correct polling site.

(b)

Precinct voter registration lists shall contain the name, address including zip code, and date of birth of each registered voter within the precinct, including those who have been designated inactive, the precinct number and county wherein the precinct is located, the name and date of the election, and a space for the voter's signature.

(c)

The following shall be printed at the top of each page of the precinct voter registration list:

“IF YOU SIGN THIS FORM AND YOU ARE NOT A LAWFULLY REGISTERED VOTER, YOU ARE MAKING A FALSE STATEMENT AND MAY BE COMMITTING PERJURY. PERJURY IS PUNISHABLE BY UP TO A $10,000 FINE AND UP TO 10 YEARS IMPRISONMENT.”

History.

Acts 1993, No. 487, § 1; 1995, No. 946, § 2; 1995, No. 963, § 2; 2009, No. 959, § 3; 2013, No. 1297, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “poll workers” for “election officials” in the section head and in (a); and substituted “polling place” for “precinct” in (a).

The 2013 amendment inserted the (a)(1) designation and added (a)(2).

7-5-108. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the time of runoff elections, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 451, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1993, No. 966, § 3.

7-5-109. Computerized voter registration lists.

(a)

The county clerks of the several counties of the state may reproduce the registered voter list maintained by the county clerk in any format that the office of the county clerk is capable of providing.

(b)

The county clerks shall be entitled to a fee in connection with the preparation of any registered voter list that shall reimburse the county clerk for reproduction expenses. The value of office equipment previously secured for the office of the county clerk shall not be considered when determining the amount of this fee.

(c)(1)(A)

Upon request every county clerk who maintains on computer the list of registered voters within the county shall provide the list on compact disc or other electronic medium.

(B)

The list shall include at least the names, addresses, and precinct numbers of the voters.

(2)(A)

The fee for a list, on compact disc or other electronic medium, of one (1) to five thousand (5,000) registered voters may be up to ten dollars ($10.00).

(B)

The fee for a list, on compact disc or other electronic medium, of five thousand one (5,001) to twenty-five thousand (25,000) registered voters may be up to twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

(C)

The fee for a list, on compact disc or other electronic medium, of more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) registered voters may be up to fifty dollars ($50.00).

(3)

If a printed list is requested, the cost of the list may be no more than two cents (2¢) per name and address.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1161, § 1; 1995, No. 924, § 2; 1995, No. 937, § 2; 1997, No. 451, § 5; 1999, No. 651, § 1; 2013, No. 1126, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “compact disc or other electronic medium” for “computer disk or tape” in (c)(1)(A) and (c)(2)(A) through (c)(2)(C).

7-5-110. Registration lists for each ballot combination.

In any precinct with more than one (1) ballot combination, the county clerk shall prepare precinct voter registration lists that identify the district, subdistrict, county, municipality, ward, and school zone in which each voter is qualified to vote.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 672, § 1; 1997, No. 451, § 6.

7-5-111. Candidacy for more than one elected office — Limitations.

A person shall not run for election for more than one (1) state, county, municipal, district, or township office if the elections are to be held on the same date.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1471, § 1; 2017, No. 158, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “municipal, district, or township office” for “or municipal office”.

Subchapter 2

— Preelection Proceedings

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1971, No. 725, § 3: Apr. 28, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the present laws of this state, a person may, under certain circumstances, become a candidate for a public office which such person is not qualified and eligible to hold even if such person were elected to the office; that it is essential to the proper administration of the election laws of this state that legislation be enacted immediately to prohibit inclusion on the ballot of the name of any person as a candidate for any public office, if such person would not be qualified and eligible to fill such office if elected, and that this act is designed to correct this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 157, § 10: Feb. 20, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the present laws of the state, that separate or common polling places cannot be established by county committees in counties using voting machines without attendant substantial costs; that it is essential to the proper and economical administration of the election laws of this state that legislation be enacted immediately to provide that respective county committees or county elections commissions in counties using voting machines may designate separate and/or common polling places where all elections can be held and to provide for a minimum number of election officials to serve at such polling places so that substantial economies can be realized in the conduct of such elections. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 930 and 941, § 3: Jan. 1, 1996.

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 946 and 963, § 14: Jan. 1, 1996.

Acts 2001, No. 1789, § 12: Emergency clause failed. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that Amendment 80 to the Arkansas Constitution becomes effective on July 1, 2001; that this implements the nonpartisan election of justices and judges as mandated by Amendment 80; and that to effectively implement Amendment 80, this act should become effective on July 1, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 48: Jan. 1, 2006.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 1185, §
21: Oct. 2, 2011.

Acts 2013, No. 595, § 7, provided: “This act shall become effective upon the later of the following:

“(1)

January 1, 2014; or

“(2)

The appropriation and availability of funding to the Secretary of State for the issuance of voter identification cards under Section 5 of this act.”The contingency in Acts 2013, No. 595, § 7 was met by Acts 2013, No. 1376.

Acts 2019, No. 597, § 10, July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is a need for uniform candidate filing and petition circulation periods; that if there is a delay in implementation, some candidate filing and petition circulation periods may be disrupted by the change in the middle of a candidate’s campaign; and that this act should become effective before candidates begin circulating petitions and filing for candidacy in the 2019 November annual school elections. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019.”

7-5-201. Voter qualification.

(a)

To be qualified to vote, a person shall have registered at least thirty (30) calendar days immediately prior to the election and in the manner set forth by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51.

(b)

“Voting residence” shall be a voter's domicile and shall be governed by the following provisions:

(1)

The domicile of a person is that place in which his or her habitation is fixed and to which he or she has the intention to return whenever he or she is absent;

(2)

A change of domicile is made only by the act of abandonment, joined with the intent to remain in another place. A person can have only one (1) domicile at any given time;

(3)

A person does not lose his or her domicile if he or she temporarily leaves his or her home and goes to another country, state, or place in this state with the intent of returning;

(4)

The place where a person's family resides is presumed to be his or her place of domicile, but a person may acquire a separate residence if he or she takes another abode with the intention of remaining there;

(5)

A married person may be considered to have a domicile separate from that of his or her spouse for the purposes of voting or holding office. For those purposes, domicile is determined as if the person were single; and

(6)

Persons who are temporarily living in a particular place because of a temporary work-related assignment or duty post or as a result of their performing duties in connection with their status as military personnel, students, or office holders shall be deemed residents of that place where they established their home prior to beginning such assignments or duties.

(c)

No person may be qualified to vote in more than one (1) precinct of any county at any one (1) time.

(d)(1)

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2) of this section and subsection (e) of this section, any person desiring to vote in this state shall:

(A)

Present verification of voter registration to the election official when appearing to vote in person either early or at the polls on election day; or

(B)

When voting by absentee ballot, submit with the ballot verification of voter registration unless the voter is:

(i)

An active duty member of the uniformed services of the United States who is absent from the county on election day because of his or her service;

(ii)

A member of the United States Merchant Marine who is absent from the county on election day because of his or her service in the United States Merchant Marine;

(iii)

The spouse or dependent of a member identified in subdivision (d)(1)(B)(i) or subdivision (d)(1)(B)(ii) of this section who is absent from the county on election day because of the active duty or service of the member; or

(iv)

A member of the Arkansas National Guard who is on state active duty and absent from the county on election day.

(2)(A)

A person who is a resident of a long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state is not required to present verification of voter registration before voting.

(B)

A person not required to present verification of voter registration under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section shall provide documentation from the administrator of the facility, attesting that the person is a resident of the facility.

(e)(1)

A person registering to vote by mail and who has not previously voted in a federal election in this state shall:

(A)

Present to the election official a current and valid photo identification or a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows the name and address of the voter when appearing to vote in person either early or at the polls on election day; or

(B)

When voting by mail, submit with the ballot a copy of a current and valid photo identification or a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows the name and address of the voter.

(2)

A person under subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall comply with requirements under this subsection in lieu of complying with subsection (d) of this section.

(3)

The provision of subdivision (e)(1) of this section does not include:

(A)

Persons whose applications are transmitted by state or federal voter registration agencies;

(B)

Persons who are covered by the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq.;

(C)

Persons covered by the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act, 52 U.S.C. § 20101 et seq.;

(D)

Persons who are entitled to vote otherwise than in person under any other federal law;

(E)

Persons who register to vote by mail and submit as part of the registration any of the identification documents listed in subdivision (e)(1) of this section; or

(F)

Persons who register to vote by mail and submit with the registration either a driver's license number or at least the last four (4) digits of the individual's Social Security number and with respect to whom a state or local election official matches the license number or Social Security number with an existing state identification record bearing the same number, name, and date of birth as provided in the registration.

(f)

Any person who receives an absentee ballot according to the precinct voter registration list but who elects to vote by early voting or to vote at his or her polling site on election day shall be permitted to cast a provisional ballot.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-707; Acts 1987, No. 248, § 7; 1993, No. 716, § 1; 1995, No. 930, § 2; 1995, No. 941, § 2; 1999, No. 1462, § 1; 1999, No. 1471, § 1; 2003, No. 994, § 2; 2005, No. 2193, § 1; 2007, No. 560, § 2; 2013, No. 595, §§ 2, 3; 2017, No. 633, § 5; 2019, No. 462, § 6.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 7, originally required that to be qualified to vote a person was to have been a resident of the state for one year, of the county for six months, and of the precinct for thirty days. The one year and the six months requirements were held unconstitutional in Smith v. Climer, 341 F. Supp. 123 (1972), and the thirty-day requirement was held unconstitutional in Meyers v. Jackson, 390 F. Supp 37 (1975). Acts 1987, No. 248 removed the statutory residency requirements.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment deleted the second sentence in (a).

The 2013 amendment inserted (d) and redesignated former (d) as (e); substituted “(e)(1)” for “(d)(1)” twice in (e)(2); added “Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1973ff et seq.” at the end of (e)(2)(B); and added “42 U.S.C. § 1973ee et seq.” at the end of (e)(2)(C).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Present verification of voter registration” for “Present proof of identity” in (d)(1)(A); substituted “verification of voter registration” for “a copy of a current and valid photo identification or a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows the name and address of the voter” in the introductory language of (d)(1)(B); rewrote (d)(1)(B)(i); substituted “United States Merchant Marine” for “merchant marine” twice in (d)(1)(A)(ii); substituted “present verification of voter registration” for “provide proof of identity” in (d)(2)(A) and (d)(2)(B); substituted “A person” for “Any person” in the introductory language of (e)(1); inserted present (e)(2) and redesignated former (e)(2) as (e)(3); substituted “52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq.” for “42 U.S.C. § 1973ff et seq.” in (e)(3)(B); substituted “52 U.S.C. § 20101 et seq.” for “42 U.S.C. § 1973ee et seq.” in (e)(3)(C); and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment added (d)(1)(B)(iv).